apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="descri/o__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ias</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iat</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ìamus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iamus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>ìais</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iais</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>iant</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tia</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tias</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tiat</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tìamus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tiais</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>tiant</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ei</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eis</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eit</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>emus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eis</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eint</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eres</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eret</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eremus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ereis</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erent</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>tu</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tos</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tas</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="descrìere">       <p><l>descri</l>    <r>descrìere</r></p><par n="descri/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iscrìere">        <p><l>iscri</l>     <r>iscrìere</r></p><par n="descri/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prescrìere">      <p><l>prescri</l>   <r>prescrìere</r></p><par n="descri/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sutascrìere">     <p><l>sutascri</l>  <r>sutascrìere</r></p><par n="descri/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trascrìere">      <p><l>trascri</l>   <r>trascrìere</r></p><par n="descri/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tzircunscrìere">  <p><l>tzircunscri</l><r>tzircunscrìere</r></p><par n="descri/o__vblex"/></e>
